Hawaii, session 2026, HB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-165, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  In every case when a citation is issued, the original of the citation shall be given to the violator[;] and a carbon copy of the citation shall be sent by certified or registered mail, with a return receipt that is postmarked within      hours of the time of the incident, to the registered owner of the vehicle at the address on record at the vehicle licensing division; provided that: (1)  In the case of an unattended vehicle, the original of the citation shall be affixed to the vehicle as provided for in section 291C-167; or (2)  In the case of: (A)  A vehicle utilizing the high occupancy vehicle lane illegally; or (B)  A vehicle illegally utilizing a parking space reserved for persons with disabilities, where the violator refuses the citation, the original of the citation shall be sent by certified or registered mail, with a return receipt that is postmarked within forty-eight hours of the time of the incident, as provided in section 291C-223 for vehicles illegally utilizing the high occupancy vehicle lane, or within seventy-two hours of the time of the incident for vehicles illegally utilizing a parking space reserved for persons with disabilities, to the registered owner of the vehicle at the address on record at the vehicle licensing division.  If the end of the applicable forty-eight [or], seventy-two, or      hour period falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, then the ending period shall run until the end of the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday; provided that the administrative judge of the district courts may allow a carbon copy of the citation to be given to the violator or affixed to the vehicle and provide for the disposition of the original and any other copies of the citation." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________